Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-321
Fish; emergency created by drying
up of waters; permission to take by any means; order; violation;
penalty.

The secretary of the commission may,
by order, authorize the taking
of fish by any means and in any number whenever the secretary determines, pursuant to standards
imposed by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
by the commission, that such action is necessary for proper fish
management as a result of an emergency created by the drying up of any waters
inhabited by fish. Such determination shall specify the waters in which such
emergency action is desirable, and the authorization so granted shall extend
to such waters and to no others. The taking of any fish in violation of this
section shall be a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1961, c. 174, § 7, p. 521;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 189;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-503.06;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 79;

Laws 2013, LB499, § 3.